src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj-4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# 4-syllable misc adjectives. Derivations are also a part of the test. ÁRMMOGIS, ÅLLAGASJ, DÁRBBOLASJ, ASIDASJ, UDNODIBME, TJALMEDIBME

Tests:

  Adjective - fábmogis: # ÁRMMOGIS
    fábmogis+A+Attr: fábmogis 
    fábmogis+A+Sg+Nom: fábmogis 
    fábmogis+A+Sg+Acc: fábmogisáv 
    fábmogis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: fábmogabbo
    fábmogis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: fábmogamos
    fábmogis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: fábmogappusj
    fábmogis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: fábmogapputjit
    fábmogis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: fábmogisát
    fábmogis+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: fábmogisvuohta

  Adjective - gullogis: # ÁRMMOGIS
    gullogis+A+Attr: gullogis
    gullogis+A+Sg+Nom: gullogis
    gullogis+A+Sg+Com: gullogisájn
    gullogis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gullogabbo
    gullogis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gullogamos
    gullogis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gullogappot
    gullogis+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gullogabmusit
    gullogis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: gullogappusj
    gullogis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gullogapputjit
    gullogis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gullogisát
    gullogis+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gullogisvuohta

  Adjective - udnodibme: # UDNODIBME
    udnodibme+A+Attr: udnodis 
    udnodibme+A+Sg+Nom: udnodibme 
    udnodibme+A+Sg+Com: udnodimijn 
    udnodibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: udnodabbo
    udnodibme+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: udnodamos
    udnodibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: udnodappusj
    udnodibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: udnodapputjit
    udnodibme+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: udnodimet
    udnodibme+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: udnodisvuohta

  Adjective - tjuovgadibme: #  TJALMEDIBME
    tjuovgadibme+A+Attr: tjuovgadis
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Nom: tjuovgadibme
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Gen: tjuovgadime
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Acc: tjuovgadimev
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Ill: tjuovgadibmáj
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Ine: tjuovgadimen
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Ela: tjuovgadimes
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Com: tjuovgadimijn
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Nom: tjuovgadime
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Gen: tjuovgadimij
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Acc: tjuovgadimijt
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Ill: tjuovgadimijda
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Ine: tjuovgadimijn
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Ela: tjuovgadimijs
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Com: tjuovgadimij
    tjuovgadibme+A+Ess: tjuovgadibmen
    tjuovgadibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjuovgadibme+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjuovgadibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjuovgadibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    tjuovgadibme+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjuovgadimet
    tjuovgadibme+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: tjuovgadisvuohta

  Adjective - bájkkásasj: # ÅLLAGASJ
    bájkkásasj+A+Attr: bájkkásasj
    bájkkásasj+A+Sg+Nom: bájkkásasj
    bájkkásasj+A+Sg+Com: bájkkásattjajn
    bájkkásasj+A+Sg+Ill: bájkkásattjaj
    bájkkásasj+A+Ess: bájkkásattjan
    bájkkásasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bájkkásasj+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bájkkásasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    bájkkásasj+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    bájkkásasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bájkkásasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    bájkkásasj+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bájkkásattjat
    bájkkásasj+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: bájkkásasjvuohta

  Adjective - dettalasj: # DÁRBBOLASJ
    dettalasj+A+Attr: dettalasj 
    dettalasj+A+Sg+Nom: dettalasj 
    dettalasj+A+Sg+Com: dettalattjajn
    dettalasj+A+Sg+Ill: dettalattjaj
    dettalasj+A+Ess: dettalattjan
    dettalasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dettalabbo
    dettalasj+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: dettalamos
    dettalasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: dettalappusj
    dettalasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dettalapputjit
    dettalasj+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dettalattjat
    dettalasj+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: dettalasjvuohta

  Adjective - dájdalasj: # ASIDASJ
    dájdalasj+A+Attr: dájdalis 
    dájdalasj+A+Sg+Nom: dájdalasj 
    dájdalasj+A+Sg+Com: dájdalattjajn 
    dájdalasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dájdalabbo
    dájdalasj+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: dájdalamos
    dájdalasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: dájdalappusj
    dájdalasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dájdalapputjit
    dájdalasj+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dájdalattjat
    dájdalasj+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: dájdalisvuohta
